District of Columbia statutes.
1-608.55

Supervision of attorneys.

(a)

Attorneys employed by the Office of the Attorney General, wherever located in the District government, including Senior Executive attorneys, shall act under the direction, supervision, and control of the Attorney General.

(a-1)

Attorneys employed by subordinate agencies shall act under the direction, supervision, and control of the head of the subordinate agency.

(b)

Attorneys employed by the Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel shall be under the direction, supervision, and control of the Director of the Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel.

(c)

Attorneys employed by independent agencies shall act under the direction, supervision, and control of the respective agency heads.

(d)

The Director of the Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel may, with the consent of a subordinate agency director, assign an attorney employed by the Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel to perform work primarily as or for the General Counsel of the affected subordinate agency, whether located at the agency or not, in the Director of the Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel’s discretion.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 855
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-260, § 2(j), 46 DCR 1318
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 3012(e), 52 DCR 7503
Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-60, § 101(e), 60 DCR 15487
This section is referenced in § 1-608.53, § 1-608.56, § 7-771.06, and § 7-1131.08.
1981 Ed., § 1-609.55.
D.C. Law 16-33, rewrote subsec. (a), (b) and (d).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-60 would have added (a-1); and would have rewritten (b) and (d).
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 1-608.51.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3012(e) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, Jan. 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-155, § 1014(c), see § 7002 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 401(a) of D.C. Law 20-60 provided that § 101 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 1013 of D.C. Law 20-155 amended D.C. Law 20-60 to provide that D.C. Law 20-60, §  101, shall apply as of October 1, 2018; Section 1014(b) of D.C. Law 20-155 amended D.C. Law 20-60 to provide that D.C. Law 20-60, §  101, shall apply as of October 1, 2014.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-155: Section 1014(c) of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that § 1014 of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7002 of D.C. Law 21-36 repealed D.C. Law 20-155, §  1014(c).